test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/N-I-D-mîpit-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mîpit - ok : # -m inanimate dependent noun, tooth    AEW V-initial NDI1
     mîpit+N+A+Sg: mîpit
     mîpit+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: nîpit
     mîpit+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: kîpit
     mîpit+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: nîpitinân
     mîpit+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: kîpitinaw
     mîpit+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: kîpitiwâw

     mîpit+N+A+Pl: mîpita
     mîpit+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: nîpita
     mîpit+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: kîpita
     mîpit+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: nîpitinâna
     mîpit+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: kîpitinawa
     mîpit+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: kîpitiwâwa

     mîpit+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: wîpita
     mîpit+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: wîpitiwâwa
     mîpit+N+A+Px4Sg+Obv: wîpitiyiwa
     mîpit+N+A+Px4Pl+Obv: wîpitiyiwa

     mîpit+N+A+Loc: mîpitihk
     mîpit+N+A+Px1Sg+Loc: nîpitihk
     mîpit+N+A+Px2Sg+Loc: kîpitihk
     mîpit+N+A+Px1Pl+Loc: nîpitinâhk
     mîpit+N+A+Px12Pl+Loc: kîpitinâhk
     mîpit+N+A+Px2Pl+Loc: kîpitiwâhk
     mîpit+N+A+Px3Sg+Loc: wîpitihk
     mîpit+N+A+Px3Pl+Loc: wîpitiwâhk
     mîpit+N+A+Px4Sg+Loc: wîpitiyihk
     mîpit+N+A+Px4Pl+Loc: wîpitiyihk

     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: mîpicis
     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [mîpicis, mîpicisis]
     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nîpicis, nîpicisis]
     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kîpicis, kîpicisis]
     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nîpicisinân, nîpicisisinân]
     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: [kîpicisinaw, kîpicisisinaw]
     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kîpicisiwâw, kîpicisisiwâw]

     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [mîpicisa, mîpicisisa]
     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nîpicisa, nîpicisisa]
     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kîpicisa, kîpicisisa]
     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nîpicisinâna, nîpicisisinâna]
     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: [kîpicisinawa, kîpicisisinawa]
     mîpit+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kîpicisiwâwa, kîpicisisiwâwa]
